Oklahoma, session 2026, SB828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 152, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 338, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 152), is amended to read as follows:


Section 152. A. Prosecutions for the crimes of bribery,


embezzlement of public money, bonds, securities, assets or property


of the state or any county, school district, municipality or other


subdivision thereof, or of any misappropriation of public money,


bonds, securities, assets or property of the state or any county,


school district, municipality or other subdivision thereof,


falsification of public records of the state or any county, school


district, municipality or other subdivision thereof, and conspiracy


to defraud the State of Oklahoma or any county, school district,

Req. No. 1562 Page 1


municipality or other subdivision thereof in any manner or for any


purpose shall be commenced within seven (7) years after the


discovery of the crime; provided, however, prosecutions for the


crimes of embezzlement or misappropriation of public money, bonds,


securities, assets or property of any school district, including


those relating to student activity funds, or the crime of


falsification of public records of any independent school district,


the crime of criminal conspiracy, the crime of embezzlement pursuant


to Sections 1451 through 1461 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


the crime of False Personation or Identity Theft pursuant to


Sections 1531 through 1533.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


the financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult pursuant to


Sections 843.1, 843.3 and 843.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, or Medicaid fraud pursuant to Section 1005 of Title 56 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, shall be commenced within five (5) years


after the discovery of the crime.


B. Prosecutions for criminal violations of any state income tax


laws shall be commenced within five (5) years after the commission


of such violation.


C. 1. Prosecutions for sexual crimes against children,


specifically rape or forcible sodomy, sodomy, lewd or indecent


proposals or acts against children, involving minors in pornography


pursuant to Section 886, 888, 1111, 1111.1, 1113, 1114, 1021.2,


1021.3, 1040.12a or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, child

Req. No. 1562 Page 2


abuse pursuant to Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult pursuant to Section


843.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, child trafficking


pursuant to Section 866 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images pursuant to


Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall may be


commenced by the forty-fifth birthday of the alleged victim at any


time. Prosecutions for such crimes committed against victims


eighteen (18) years of age or older shall may be commenced within


twenty (20) years after the discovery of the crime. As used in this


paragraph, “discovery” means the date that a physical or sexually


related crime involving a victim eighteen (18) years of age or older


is reported to a law enforcement agency. Any offense for which the


prosecution is not time-barred upon the effective date of this act


shall be retroactively subject to the provisions of this subsection


at any time.


2. However, prosecutions Prosecutions for the crimes listed in


paragraph 1 of this subsection may be commenced at any time after


the commission of the offense if:


a. physical evidence is collected and preserved that is


capable of being tested to obtain a profile from


deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA), and


b. probable cause as to the identity of the offender is


subsequently established through the use of a DNA

Req. No. 1562 Page 3


profile using evidence listed in subparagraph a of


this paragraph, or


c. the accused person has provided a confession or


admission related to the crime.


3. No prosecution under this subsection shall be based upon the


memory of the victim that has been recovered through psychotherapy


unless there is some evidence independent of such repressed memory.


4. Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a false claim


pursuant to this subsection or a claim that the person knows lacks


factual foundation may be reported to local law enforcement for


criminal investigation and, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a


felony.


D. Prosecutions for criminal violations of any provision of the


Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Code shall be commenced within three


(3) years after the commission of such offense.


E. Prosecutions for the crime of criminal fraud or workers’


compensation fraud pursuant to Section 1541.1, 1541.2, 1662 or 1663


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall commence within three (3)


years after the discovery of the crime, but in no event greater than


seven (7) years after the commission of the crime.


F. Prosecution for the crime of false or bogus check pursuant


to Section 1541.1, 1541.2, 1541.3 or 1541.4 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes shall be commenced within five (5) years after the


commission of such offense.

Req. No. 1562 Page 4


G. Prosecution for the crime of solicitation for murder in the


first degree pursuant to Section 701.16 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes shall be commenced within seven (7) years after the


discovery of the crime. For purposes of this subsection,


“discovery” means the date upon which the crime is made known to


anyone other than a person involved in the solicitation.


H. In all other cases a prosecution for a public offense must


be commenced within three (3) years after its commission.


I. Prosecution for the crime of accessory after the fact must


be commenced within the same statute of limitations as that of the


felony for which the person acted as an accessory.


J. Prosecution for the crime of arson pursuant to Section 1401,


1402, 1403, 1404 or 1405 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall


be commenced within seven (7) years after the commission of the


crime.


K. Prosecutions for criminal violations in which a deadly


weapon is used to commit a felony or prosecutions for criminal


violations in which a deadly weapon is used in an attempt to commit


a felony shall be commenced within seven (7) years after the


commission of the crime.


L. Prosecutions for the crime of human trafficking pursuant to


Section 748 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be commenced


within three (3) years after discovery of the crime. For purposes



Req. No. 1562 Page 5


of this subsection, “discovery” means the date upon which the crime


is reported to a law enforcement agency.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1562 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:12 AM







































Req. No. 1562 Page 6